Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-320.01
Telecommunications, defined.

Telecommunications means the transmission between or among points specified by the user of information of the user's choosing without change in the form or content of the information as sent and received.

Laws 2007, LB661, § 6.